Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0554.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Disability" means a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits 1 or more major life activities of an individual. (b) "Program" means the blue envelope program created in section 2. (c) "Qualified individual" means an individual who has been diagnosed with a disability or who has a communication impediment designation elected under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308, or the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. Sec. 2. (1) The blue envelope program is created within the department of state. (2) The department of state shall develop and administer the program. The program must meet all of the following requirements: (a) The program must allow a qualified individual to obtain, at no cost, a blue envelope from any secretary of state branch office. (b) The blue envelope described in subdivision (a) must allow for the inclusion of all of the following content: (i) The qualified individual's documents and cards for identification, contact information, and emergency contact information. (ii) Documents related to the qualified individual's vehicle, including, but not limited to, vehicle registration documents and proof of insurance. (iii) Information concerning the qualified individual's disability or communication impediment, including, but not limited to, important medical information and potential physical or emotional reactions the qualified individual may display during an interaction with another individual. (c) The program must provide a qualified individual, at no cost, a sticker, bracelet, or lanyard that the qualified individual may display or use to indicate that the qualified individual is carrying a blue envelope and has been diagnosed with a disability or has elected a communication impediment designation. (3) A qualified individual may, with any interaction with a law enforcement officer, present a blue envelope described in subsection (2) to the officer.